Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1538.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2322(a)(1) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2322. Prohibited devices and methods.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this title or commission regulation, no person shall hunt, kill or take or attempt, aid, abet, assist or conspire to hunt, kill or take any big game, except wild turkey, with any of the following devices or methods:(1) Any device other than a centerfire or muzzle-loading firearm, air rifle or bow and arrow.* * *Section 2. All regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819